Utah statutes.
13-11a-4.   Jurisdiction of district courts -- Injunctive relief -- Damages
-- Attorneys' fees -- Corrective advertising -- Notification required.
(1)  The district courts of this state have jurisdiction over any supplier as
to any act or practice in this state governed by this chapter or as to any
claim arising from a deceptive trade practice as defined in this chapter.
(2) (a)  Any person or the state may maintain an action to enjoin a
continuance of any act in violation of this chapter and, if injured by the
act, for the recovery of damages.  If, in such action, the court finds that
the defendant is violating or has violated any of the provisions of this
chapter, it shall enjoin the defendant from continuance of the violation.   It
is not necessary that actual damages be proven.
(b)  In addition to injunctive relief, the plaintiff is entitled to recover
from the defendant the amount of actual damages sustained or $2,000, whichever
is greater.
(c)  Costs shall be allowed to the prevailing party unless the court otherwise
directs.  The court shall award attorneys' fees to the prevailing party.
(3)  The court may order the defendant to promulgate corrective advertising by
the same media and with the same distribution and frequency as the advertising
found to violate this chapter.
(4)  The remedies of this section are in addition to remedies otherwise
available for the same conduct under state or local law.
(5)  No action for injunctive relief may be brought for a violation of this
chapter unless the complaining person first gives notice of the alleged
violation to the prospective defendant and provides the prospective defendant
an opportunity to promulgate a correction notice by the same media as the
allegedly violating advertisement.  If the prospective defendant does not
promulgate a correction notice within ten days of receipt of the notice, the
complaining person may file a lawsuit under this chapter.
